Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2603.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5702 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 5702. Definitions.As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Visual indicator." A light or device on a wearable recording device that indicates that the device is capturing sound or video."Wearable recording device." A device or apparatus that is designed to be worn on or attached to the body that has the 123456789101112131415161718 capacity to intercept and make sound or video recordings or transmit data received by the device to another device, the Internet or any other cloud-based service.* * *Section 2. Chapter 57 of Title 18 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER D.1WEARABLE RECORDING DEVICESSec.5765.1. Visual indicators required.5765.2. Notification required.5765.3. Operation of wearable recording devices.5765.4. Exceptions and penalties.§ 5765.1. Visual indicators required.(a) Prohibitions.--(1) A person shall not manufacture, sell, deliver, hold or offer for sale in commerce in this Commonwealth:(i) A wearable recording device without a visual indicator.(ii) A device, computer code or other form of technology that enables a person to disable a visual indicator.(2) A person shall not purchase, trade for or otherwise acquire the device, computer code or other form of technology described under paragraph (1).(3) An individual in this Commonwealth shall not use any technology or other means to permanently or temporarily disable or obstruct a visual indicator.(b) Reporting system.--A manufacturer of a wearable recording device shall establish a system to receive reports 20260HB2603PN3526 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 about visual indicator malfunctions from members of the public.§ 5765.2. Notification required.Any retailer that sells a wearable recording device in this Commonwealth must provide customers with a written notice informing the customer of requirements under section 5765.3 (relating to operation of wearable recording devices). The notice shall be separate from other information provided to customers and shall be made clear and conspicuous for the customer.§ 5765.3. Operation of wearable recording devices.(a) Recording of others.--An individual shall not operate a wearable recording device to capture sound or video of any other individual in any area where the other individual has a reasonable expectation of privacy unless the individual operating the device has the explicit consent of that other individual.(b) Visual indicator requirement.--An individual shall not operate a wearable recording device to capture sound or video of any other individual in any place without the other individual's actual knowledge if:(1) the wearable recording device does not have a visual indicator; or(2) the visual indicator of the recording device has been permanently or temporarily disabled.§ 5765.4. Exceptions and penalties.(a) Exceptions.--This subchapter does not apply to:(1) Law enforcement officers during a lawful criminal investigation.(2) Law enforcement officers or personnel of the Department of Corrections or a local correctional facility, 20260HB2603PN3526 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prison or jail for security purposes or during investigation of alleged misconduct by an individual in the custody of the Department of Corrections or local authorities.(b) Offense.--Except as specified in subsections (a), (c) and (d), a person that knowingly violates this subchapter is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.(c) Penalty for violation of notification requirement.--A retailer that knowingly violates section 5765.2 (relating to notification required) shall be subject to the following penalties:(1) For a first violation, the Attorney General or district attorney, where appropriate, shall contact the retailer via certified mail and inform the retailer that corrective action is required to comply with this subchapter. Within 30 days of receipt of the letter, the retailer shall contact the Attorney General or district attorney, where appropriate, and document the corrective action taken to comply with this section.(2) If the retailer fails to timely contact the Attorney General or district attorney, where appropriate, or provide documentation of corrective action or does not comply with this section, the retailer commits a second violation and shall be subject to the penalties under paragraph (3). A retailer that commits a second violation under this paragraph shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than $500.(3) A retailer that commits a third and subsequent violation of this subsection shall be subject to a civil penalty of no more than $1,000.(d) Penalty for violation of visual indicator requirement.--A manufacturer that knowingly violates section 5765.1 (relating 20260HB2603PN3526 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to visual indicators required) shall be subject to the following penalties:(1) A penalty of $500 for each product manufactured and sold in violation of section 5765.1.(2) For a second violation within a 12-month period, a penalty of at least $750 but not more than $1,000 for each product manufactured and sold in violation of section 5765.1.(3) For a third violation within a 12-month period, a penalty of at least $1,000 but not more than $1,500 for each product manufactured and sold in violation of section 5765.1.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2603PN3526 - 5 - 1234567891011